Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.40
Territory or sales territory, defined.

Territory or sales territory
means the wholesaler's area of sales responsibility for the brand or brands
of the manufacturer.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 48.